Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska33-140.02
Unclaimed witness fees; payment to county treasurer; credited to school fund.

All unclaimed witness fees remaining in the hands of the clerk of the district or county court for the period of six months after the list has been filed with the county board shall be paid over to the county treasurer who shall receipt in duplicate for the fees, one of which receipts shall be filed with the county clerk. All such fees shall be credited to the common school fund of the county.

Laws 1877, § 2, p. 226;

R.S.1913, § 6677;

C.S.1922, § 6214;

C.S.1929, § 77-2603;

R.S.1943, § 77-2403;

Laws 1972, LB 1032, § 273;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 77-2403;

Laws 1989, LB 11, § 3.